Missouri, session 2026, SB1679.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 32.310, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 32.310,
to read as follows:
32.310. 1. The department of revenue shall create and
maintain [a] mapping [feature] features on its official
public website that [displays] display sales and use tax and
property tax information of political subdivisions of this
state that have taxing authority, including the current tax
rate for each sales and use tax imposed and collected and
the current levies of each property tax district imposed and
collected on a separate map. [Such] Each display shall have
the option to showcase the borders and jurisdiction of the
following political subdivisions on a map of the state to
the extent that such political subdivisions collect sales
and use tax or property tax:
(1) Ambulance districts;
(2) Community improvement districts;
(3) Fire protection districts;
(4) Levee districts;
(5) Library districts;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1679 2
(6) Neighborhood improvement districts;
(7) Port authority districts;
(8) Tax increment financing districts;
(9) Transportation development districts;
(10) School districts; or
(11) Any other political subdivision that imposes a
sales or use tax or a property tax within its borders and
jurisdiction.
2. [The] Each mapping feature shall also have the
option to superimpose state house of representative
districts and state senate districts over the political
subdivisions. The base layer of each mapping feature shall
be color-coded based on taxation rates.
3. A political subdivision collecting sales or use tax
or property tax listed in subsection 1 of this section shall
provide to the department of revenue mapping and geographic
data pertaining to the political subdivision's borders and
jurisdictions. The political subdivision shall certify the
accuracy of the data by affidavit and shall provide the data
in a format specified by the department of revenue. Such
data relating to sales taxes shall be sent to the department
of revenue by April 1, 2019, and shall be updated and sent
to the department if a change in the political subdivision's
borders or jurisdiction occurs thereafter. Such data
relating to use taxes shall be sent to the department of
revenue by January 1, 2022. Such data relating to property
taxes shall be sent to the department of revenue by January
1, 2027. If a political subdivision fails to provide the
information required under this subsection, the department
of revenue shall use the last known sales or use tax or
property tax rate for such political subdivision.

SB 1679 3
4. The department of revenue may contract with another
entity to build and maintain the mapping [feature] features.
5. By July 1, 2019, the department shall implement the
mapping feature using the sales tax data provided to it
under subsection 3 of this section. By July 1, 2022, the
department shall implement the mapping feature using use tax
data provided to it under subsection 3 of this section. By
July 1, 2027, the department shall implement the additional
property tax mapping feature using property tax levy data
from the most recent publication of the Missouri state
auditor's report on property tax rates and any additional
supplemental information provided to the department under
subsection 3 of this section. The home page of the
department's public website shall prominently display links
directing the public to each of the sales, use, and property
tax mapping features.
6. By July 1, 2022, the department shall update the
mapping feature to include the total sales tax rate for
combined rates of overlapping sales taxes levied and the
total use tax rate for combined rates of overlapping use
taxes levied.
7. If the boundaries of a political subdivision listed
in subsection 1 of this section in which a sales or use tax
or a property tax has been imposed shall thereafter be
changed or altered, the political subdivision shall forward
to the director of revenue by United States registered mail
or certified mail a certified copy of the ordinance adding
or detaching territory from the political subdivision within
ten days of adoption of the ordinance. The ordinance shall
reflect the effective date of the ordinance and shall be
accompanied by a map in a form to be determined by the
director of revenue. Upon receipt of the ordinance and map,

SB 1679 4
the tax imposed under the local sales tax law shall be
effective in the added territory or abolished in the
detached territory on the first day of a calendar quarter
after one hundred twenty days' notice to sellers. The
department shall also use the most recent publication of the
Missouri state auditor's report on property tax rates in
order to update and maintain the property tax levy data each
year.
✓